Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2428
Permit to carry concealed handgun; authorized.

An individual may obtain a permit to carry a concealed handgun in accordance with the Concealed Handgun Permit Act.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 2.